lexd_components/hyx-names_hyebased.lexd
#Names that were found from hye-based sources and then manually changed to hyw



#Taken from https://hy.wikipedia.org/wiki/%D4%BF%D5%A1%D5%BF%D5%A5%D5%A3%D5%B8%D6%80%D5%AB%D5%A1:%D5%80%D5%A1%D5%B5%D5%AF%D5%A1%D5%AF%D5%A1%D5%B6_%D5%A1%D5%A6%D5%A3%D5%A1%D5%B6%D5%B8%D6%82%D5%B6%D5%B6%D5%A5%D6%80
#Guide: change yan to ian, and change ju to iw, der to dEr
LEXICON NameFamily

#not jan
Ադոնց:Ադոնց
Ադունց:Ադունց
Աբելանց:Աբելանց
Ադրունի:Ադրունի
Բազունց:Բազունց
Բզնունի:Բզնունի
Աթասունց:Աթասունց
Ամատունի:Ամատունի
Ապահունի:Ապահունի
Արծրունի:Արծրունի
Աղավնունի:Աղավնունի
Արշարունի:Արշարունի
Աշխարհունի:Աշխարհունի
Բագրատունի:Բագրատունի

#janc EA style
Աբալանց:Աբալանց
Աբաղանց:Աբաղանց
Աբաջանց:Աբաջանց
Ագանանց:Ագանանց
Ադամանց:Ադամանց
Ազատանց:Ազատանց
Աթալանց:Աթալանց
Ավագանց:Ավագանց
Արխիպանց:Արխիպանց
Աթաբեկանց:Աթաբեկանց
Աբեսալոմանց:Աբեսալոմանց
Գրիգորյանց:Գրիգորյանց

#janc WA style
Աբալեանց:Աբալեանց
Աբաղեանց:Աբաղեանց
Աբաջեանց:Աբաջեանց
Ագանեանց:Ագանեանց
Ադամեանց:Ադամեանց
Ազատեանց:Ազատեանց
Աթալեանց:Աթալեանց
Ավագեանց:Ավագեանց
Արխիպեանց:Արխիպեանց
Աթաբեկեանց:Աթաբեկեանց
Աբեսալոմեանց:Աբեսալոմեանց
Գրիգորեանց:Գրիգորեանց

#vowel jan
Եսայան:Եսայան
Աբայան:Աբայան
Ադայան:Ադայան
Աթայան:Աթայան
Աբոյան:Աբոյան
Ագոյան:Ագոյան
Ադոյան:Ադոյան
Ազոյան:Ազոյան
Աթոյան:Աթոյան
Ալոյան:Ալոյան
Ախոյան:Ախոյան
Անոյան:Անոյան
Ավոյան:Ավոյան
Արոյան:Արոյան
Աբդոյան:Աբդոյան
Աբրոյան:Աբրոյան
Ադլոյան:Ադլոյան
Ազնոյան:Ազնոյան
Ազրոյան:Ազրոյան
Աթլոյան:Աթլոյան
Անթոյան:Անթոյան
Ապրոյան:Ապրոյան
Բալոյան:Բալոյան
Բարոյան:Բարոյան
Բերոյան:Բերոյան
Բոռոյան:Բոռոյան
Բորոյան:Բորոյան
Գալոյան:Գալոյան
Մադոյան:Մադոյան
Միկոյան:Միկոյան
Սարոյան:Սարոյան
Սիսոյան:Սիսոյան
Վանոյան:Վանոյան
Տոնոյան:Տոնոյան
Ադալոյան:Ադալոյան
Բաբլոյան:Բաբլոյան
Միրզոյան:Միրզոյան
Ամպերոյան:Ամպերոյան
Աբիյան:Աբիյան
Ադիյան:Ադիյան
Բաբիյան:Բաբիյան
Բաջիյան:Բաջիյան
Բոզիյան:Բոզիյան
Բերչիյան:Բերչիյան
Զավրիյան:Զավրիյան
Արզույան:Արզույան
Բալույան:Բալույան
Բաբաբլույան:Բաբաբլույան
Ախայան:Ախայան
Աղայան:Աղայան
Ազդայան:Ազդայան
Բաբայան:Բաբայան
Բալայան:Բալայան
Ադեյան:Ադեյան
Աթեյան:Աթեյան
Աբրեյան:Աբրեյան
Ամսեյան:Ամսեյան
Բազեյան:Բազեյան
Զելվեյան:Զելվեյան
Արեւյան:Արեւյան
#Արևյան:Արևյան #digraph form
Բինայան:Բինայան
Գայայան:Գայայան
Թառայան:Թառայան
Լալայան:Լալայան
Աբազայան:Աբազայան
Բակլայան:Բակլայան
Գալֆայան:Գալֆայան
Աբունայան:Աբունայան
Գապատայան:Գապատայան

#can use traditional form with glide
Եսայեան:Եսայեան
Աբայեան:Աբայեան
Ադայեան:Ադայեան
Աթայեան:Աթայեան
Աբոյեան:Աբոյեան
Ագոյեան:Ագոյեան
Ադոյեան:Ադոյեան
Ազոյեան:Ազոյեան
Աթոյեան:Աթոյեան
Ալոյեան:Ալոյեան
Ախոյեան:Ախոյեան
Անոյեան:Անոյեան
Ավոյեան:Ավոյեան
Արոյեան:Արոյեան
Աբդոյեան:Աբդոյեան
Աբրոյեան:Աբրոյեան
Ադլոյեան:Ադլոյեան
Ազնոյեան:Ազնոյեան
Ազրոյեան:Ազրոյեան
Աթլոյեան:Աթլոյեան
Անթոյեան:Անթոյեան
Ապրոյեան:Ապրոյեան
Բալոյեան:Բալոյեան
Բարոյեան:Բարոյեան
Բերոյեան:Բերոյեան
Բոռոյեան:Բոռոյեան
Բորոյեան:Բորոյեան
Գալոյեան:Գալոյեան
Մադոյեան:Մադոյեան
Միկոյեան:Միկոյեան
Սարոյեան:Սարոյեան
Սիսոյեան:Սիսոյեան
Վանոյեան:Վանոյեան
Տոնոյեան:Տոնոյեան
Ադալոյեան:Ադալոյեան
Բաբլոյեան:Բաբլոյեան
Միրզոյեան:Միրզոյեան
Ամպերոյեան:Ամպերոյեան
Աբիյեան:Աբիյեան
Ադիյեան:Ադիյեան
Բաբիյեան:Բաբիյեան
Բաջիյեան:Բաջիյեան
Բոզիյեան:Բոզիյեան
Բերչիյեան:Բերչիյեան
Զավրիյեան:Զավրիյեան
Արզույեան:Արզույեան
Բալույեան:Բալույեան
Բաբաբլույեան:Բաբաբլույեան
Ախայեան:Ախայեան
Աղայեան:Աղայեան
Ազդայեան:Ազդայեան
Բաբայեան:Բաբայեան
Բալայեան:Բալայեան
Ադեյեան:Ադեյեան
Աթեյեան:Աթեյեան
Աբրեյեան:Աբրեյեան
Ամսեյեան:Ամսեյեան
Բազեյեան:Բազեյեան
Զելվեյեան:Զելվեյեան
Արեւյեան:Արեւյեան
Բինայեան:Բինայեան
Գայայեան:Գայայեան
Թառայեան:Թառայեան
Լալայեան:Լալայեան
Աբազայեան:Աբազայեան
Բակլայեան:Բակլայեան
Գալֆայեան:Գալֆայեան
Աբունայեան:Աբունայեան
Գապատայեան:Գապատայեան
